Maryland, session 2026, SB0956.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0956*

SENATE BILL 956
21–1414.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Authority” means the Maryland Transportation Authority.
(11) “Video toll” means the amount assessed by the Authority when a video
toll transaction occurs.
(h) (1) The Authority may refer a delinquent account for unpaid video tolls and
associated civil penalties to the Central Collection Unit for collection.
(2) The Authority may recall a delinquent account from the Central
Collection Unit if:
(i) The delinquent account exceeds $300 in unpaid video tolls and
associated civil penalties;
(ii) The video tolls in question were assessed within a 30–day period;
or
(iii) Mitigating factors exist with respect to the assessment of the
unpaid video tolls and associated civil penalties, as determined by the Authority.
(3) (I) [Notwithstanding any other provision of law, until the Authority
refers the debt to the Central Collection Unit or after the Authority has recalled a
delinquent account from the Central Collection Unit, the] THE Authority may waive any
portion of the video toll due or civil penalty assessed ON A DELINQUENT ACCOUNT under
this section.
(II) IF THE AUTHORITY WAIVES ANY PORTION OF THE VIDEO
TOLL DUE OR CIVIL PENALTY ASSESSED:
1. THE AUTHORITY SHALL NOTIFY THE CENTRAL
COLLECTION UNIT OF THE AMOUNT OF THE REVISED DEBT; AND
2. THE CENTRAL COLLECTION UNIT SHALL REDUCE
THE FEE ASSESSED UNDER § 3–304(A) OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT
ARTICLE BASED ON THE AMOUNT OF THE REVISED DEBT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.